Utah statutes.
17-30-24.   More than one chief deputy in larger county departments.

In counties employing more than 100 full time uniformed peace officers, the appointing authority, with the consent of the merit commission and the county  legislative body, may appoint more than one chief deputy or undersheriff.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

